Massachusetts, session 194th, H4691.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The registrar shall furnish, without charge to owners of private passenger motor vehicles
who reside in Massachusetts, the Orange Star plate. Upon evidence deemed satisfactory by the
registrar, registration plates bearing the Orange Star distinctive emblem that identifies Vietnam
veterans who have a documented medical condition that the VA attributes to service in Vietnam
for one private passenger motor vehicle or motorcycle owned and principally used by such
recipient; provided, however, that the surviving spouse of a deceased recipient may elect to
retain such distinctive registration plates or emblem for personal use upon payment of the
established registration fee for private passenger motor vehicles or motorcycles and an additional
annual twenty dollar fee until such spouse remarries or fails to renew or cancels such
registration. This recognition is not officially a military medal, but a symbol of appreciation for
those affected by Agent Orange.
of 1